Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.007

Student absence elimination and prevention—Guidance from the superintendent of public instruction.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and publish best practice guidance to eliminate or reduce student absences and to otherwise implement the requirements of this chapter. The guidance must focus on student and family engagement, be based in restorative justice practices, and emphasize integration of student and family support systems. The guidance must be developed in consultation with the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee and updated periodically.

[ 2021 c 119 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 119 ss 1-6: "Sections 1 through 6 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [April 26, 2021]." [ 2021 c 119 s 16.]

Findings—Intent—2021 c 119: "(1) The legislature acknowledges that student absences from school can be an indicator that the academic and social-emotional needs of the students are not being met in the public school or classroom or through the school culture or climate. Student absences can also signal to educators that families may need additional information and assistance in supporting student learning within the home.

(2) The legislature finds that as research and public awareness grows about the impact of school climate and culture on the academic and social-emotional experiences of students, the systems of public education must shift away from enforcing punitive, compliance-focused policies and toward enabling constructive, student-centered practices. The legislature further finds that a student-centered system of public education serves the individual needs of students with strong family engagement and through integrated supports provided by the state, public schools, and the greater community.

(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to refocus the attendance policies and practices of the public education system to emphasize individualized student and family supports that are culturally responsive, evidence-informed, and show promising practice for integrating multiple systems of support to effectively improve consistent student attendance at school and family engagement in student learning." [ 2021 c 119 s 1.]